Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-612
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-612 to 86-643 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2101;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 374.